Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1614
Chief Water Officer, defined.

Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 14;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 276.